sv: Topplockets position: Cylinderbank 1; Cylinderbank 2; Mitten; Fram; Vänster sida; Nedre; Ej tillämpligt (enkeltopp); Bak; Höger sida; Universell; Övre; Annat
sk-SK: Poloha hlavy valcov: Rad 1; Rad 2; Stred; Vpredu; Ľavá strana; Spodná; Neuplatňuje sa (jedna hlava); Vzadu; Pravá strana; Univerzálna; Horná; Iné
pt-BR: Posição do cabeçote do cilindro: Banco 1; Banco 2; Centro; Frente; Lado esquerdo; Inferior; Não aplicável (cabeçote único); Traseira; Lado direito; Universal; Superior; Outros
fr: Emplacement de la culasse: Banc 1; Banc 2; Centre; Avant; Côté gauche; Inférieur; Non applicable (culasse unique); Arrière; Côté droit; Universel; Supérieur; Autre
fi: Sylinterikannen paikka: Lohko 1; Lohko 2; Keskellä; Edessä; Vasen puoli; Alempi; Ei sovellu (yksi sylinterikansi); Takana; Oikea puoli; Yleismalli; Ylempi; Muu
hu: Hengerfej helyzete: 1. hengersor; 2. hengersor; Középső; Első; Bal oldal; Alsó; Nem alkalmazható (egy hengerfej); Hátsó; Jobb oldal; Univerzális; Felső; Egyéb
ru: Позиция головки блока цилиндров: Ряд 1; Ряд 2; По центру; Спереди; Левая сторона; Снизу; Неприменимо (одна головка); Сзади; Правая сторона; Универсальное; Сверху; Другое
ro-RO: Poziția chiulasei: Banc 1; Banc 2; Centru; Față; Partea stângă; Inferior; Nu se aplică (chiulasă unică); Spate; Partea dreaptă; Universal; Superior; Altele
hr-HR: Položaj glave cilindra: Red 1; Red 2; Sredina; Sprijeda; Lijeva strana; Donja; Nije primjenjivo (jedna glava); Straga; Desna strana; Univerzalno; Gornja; Ostalo
en: Cylinder head position: Bank 1; Bank 2; Center; Front; Left side; Lower; Not applicable (single head); Rear; Right side; Universal; Upper; Other
zh-CN: 气缸盖位置: 排 1; 排 2; 中心; 前部; 左侧; 下部; 不适用（单缸盖）; 后部; 右侧; 通用; 上部; 其他
nl: Cilinderkop positie: Cilinderrij 1; Cilinderrij 2; Midden; Voor; Linkerkant; Onder; Niet van toepassing (enkele cilinderkop); Achter; Rechterkant; Universeel; Boven; Overig
bg-BG: Позиция на цилиндровата глава: Ред цилиндри 1; Ред цилиндри 2; Център; Предна; Лява страна; Долна; Не е приложимо (единична глава); Задна; Дясна страна; Универсална; Горна; Други
tr: Silindir kapağının konumu: Sıra 1; Sıra 2; Orta; Ön; Sol taraf; Alt; Geçerli değil (tek silindir kapağı); Arka; Sağ taraf; Evrensel; Üst; Diğer
ko: 실린더 헤드 위치: 뱅크 1; 뱅크 2; 중앙; 전면; 왼쪽; 하단; 해당 없음(싱글 헤드); 후면; 오른쪽; 범용; 상단; 기타
lt-LT: Cilindro galvutės padėtis: 1 eilė; 2 eilė; Centrinė; Priekinė; Kairioji pusė; Apatinė; Netaikoma (viena galvutė); Galinė; Dešinioji pusė; Universali; Viršutinė; Kita
de: Position des Zylinderkopfs: Bank 1; Bank 2; Mitte; Vorne; Linke Seite; Unten; Nicht zutreffend (Einzelzylinderkopf); Hinten; Rechte Seite; Universal; Oben; Sonstige
th: ตำแหน่งของฝาสูบ: แบงก์ 1; แบงก์ 2; ตรงกลาง; ด้านหน้า; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านล่าง; ไม่มี (ฝาสูบเดี่ยว); ด้านหลัง; ด้านขวา; ใช้ได้ทั่วไป; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
es: Posición de la culata: Banco 1; Banco 2; Centro; Frente; Lado izquierdo; Inferior; No aplicable (cabezal único); Parte trasera; Lado derecho; Universal; Superior; Otro
vi: Vị trí đầu xi lanh: Dãy 1; Dãy 2; Giữa; Trước; Bên trái; Dưới; Không áp dụng (đầu nòng đơn); Sau; Bên phải; Dùng chung; Trên; Khác
it: Posizione della testa del cilindro: Bancata 1; Bancata 2; Centrale; Anteriore; Lato sinistro; Inferiore; Non applicabile (testata singola); Posteriore; Lato destro; Universale; Superiore; Altro
sl-SI: Položaj glave valja: Vrsta 1; Vrsta 2; Sredina; Spredaj; Leva stran; Spodaj; Ni primerno (enojna glava); Zadaj; Desna stran; Univerzalno; Zgoraj; Drugo
nb: Sylinderhodeposisjon: Bank 1; Bank 2; Midtre; Fremre; Venstre side; Nedre; Ikke aktuelt (enkelt topplokk); Bakre; Høyre side; Universell; Øvre; Annet
ja: シリンダーヘッドの位置: バンク1; バンク2; センター; フロント; 左側; ロワー; 該当なし (シングルヘッド); リア; 右側; ユニバーサル; アッパー; その他
da: Topstykkets position: Række 1; Række 2; Centrum; Forrest; Venstre side; Nederste; Ikke relevant (enkelt topstykke); Bagerst; Højre side; Universel; Øverste; Andet
pt-PT: Posição da cabeça do cilindro: Bancada 1; Bancada 2; Centro; Dianteira; Lado esquerdo; Inferior; Não aplicável (cabeça única); Traseira; Lado direito; Universal; Superior; Outra
zh-TW: 汽缸蓋位置: 缸排 1; 缸排 2; 中央; 前方; 左側; 下方; 不適用 (單缸頭); 後方; 右側; 通用; 上方; 其他
pl: Położenie głowicy cylindra: Rząd 1; Rząd 2; Środek; Przód; Lewa strona; Dół; Nie dotyczy (pojedyncza głowica); Tył; Prawa strona; Uniwersalna; Góra; Inne
el: Θέση κυλινδροκεφαλής: Σειρά κυλίνδρων 1; Σειρά κυλίνδρων 2; Κέντρο; Εμπρός; Αριστερή πλευρά; Κάτω; Δεν ισχύει (μονή κεφαλή); Πίσω; Δεξιά πλευρά; Γενικής χρήσης; Επάνω; Άλλο
cs: Poloha hlavy válců: Řada 1; Řada 2; Střed; Přední; Levá strana; Spodní; Nelze použít (jedna hlava); Zadní; Pravá strana; Univerzální; Horní; Jiné